Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB450.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 219. Amnesty for Disciplinary Actions Regarding COVID-19 Protocols.-- A license that was suspended or revoked or any disciplinary action taken by the board on a licensee for failure to comply with any of the following during the period in 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 which the Governor's Proclamation of Disaster Emergency issued on March 6, 2020, published at 50 Pa.B. 1644 (March 21, 2020) was in effect shall be removed or reinstated:(1) A proclamation or order of the Governor under 35 Pa.C.S. § 7301(f)(7) (relating to general authority of Governor), s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as "The Administrative Code of 1929," or section 5 of the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the "Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955," which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(2) An order of the Secretary of Health under s ection 8(a) of the act of April 27, 1905 (P.L.312, No.218), entitled "An act creating a Department of Health, and defining its powers and duties," section 2102(a) or 2106 of "The Administrative Code of 1929," section 5 of the " Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955" or 28 Pa. Code § 27.60 (relating to disease control measures), 27.61 (relating to isolation), 27.65 (relating to quarantine), 27.66 (relating to placarding), 27.67 (relating to movement of persons and animals subject to isolation or quarantine by action of a local health authority or the Department) or 27.68 (relating to release from isolation or quarantine), which relates to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."(3) Guidance issued by the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services relating to the novel coronavirus known as "COVID-19."Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0450PN0427 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930